Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-360
Well-servicing equipment, defined.

Well-servicing equipment means equipment used for the (1) care and replacement of down-hole production equipment and (2) restimulation of a well.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 60.